Utah statutes.
26-7-4.   Utah Registry of Autism and Developmental Disabilities.

(1)  As used in this section, "URADD" means the Utah Registry of Autism and Developmental Disabilities.

(2)  The department may enter into an agreement with:

(a)  the University of Utah or another person for the operation of URADD; and

(b)  a person to conduct a public education campaign to:

(i)  improve public awareness of the early warning signs of autism spectrum disorders and developmental disabilities; and

(ii)  promote the early identification of autism spectrum disorders and developmental disabilities.

(3)  URADD shall consist of a database that collects information on people in the state who have an autism spectrum disorder or a developmental disability.

(4)  The purpose of URADD is to assist health care providers to:

(a)  determine the risk factors and causes of autism spectrum disorders and developmental disabilities;

(b)  plan for and develop resources, therapies, methods of diagnoses, and other services for people with an autism spectrum disorder or a developmental disability;

(c)  facilitate measuring and tracking of treatment outcomes;

(d)  gather statistics relating to autism spectrum disorders and developmental disabilities; and

(e)  improve coordination and cooperation between agencies and other programs that provide services to people with an autism spectrum disorder or a developmental disability.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 2008 General Session

